Louisiana, session 2026, HB1133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Dream Starter Act".
Section 2. R.S. 39:100.257 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§100.257. The First-Generation Homebuyer Assistance Fund; purpose
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury, a special fund, the First-
Generation Homebuyer Assistance Fund, hereinafter referred to in this Section as the
"fund".
B. After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
the treasurer shall deposit into the fund monies transferred or appropriated by the
legislature, and any grants, donations, gifts, or other monies which may become
available.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2688 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1133
C. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
credited to the fund. Unexpended or unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of
the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
D. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the Louisiana Housing
Corporation for the purposes of the Dream Starter Program as provided in R.S.
40:600.121.
Section 3. R.S. 40:600.121 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§600.121. Dream Starter Program
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that expanding sustainable
homeownership strengthens workforce stability, local tax bases, and long-term
household wealth and that residents without generational wealth or prior exposure
to homeownership face barriers that are not fully addressed by income screening
alone.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "First-time homebuyer" means an individual who has not held an
ownership interest in residential real estate within the previous three years.
(2) "First-generation homebuyer" means a first-time homebuyer who has not
previously held sole ownership of residential real estate and who meets one or more
additional criteria established by rules promulgated by the corporation pursuant to
this Section.
(3) "Principal residence" means an owner-occupied residential dwelling,
including a single-family residence and other owner-occupied residential structures
recognized by rules promulgated by the corporation pursuant to this Section.
(4) "Corporation" means the Louisiana Housing Corporation.
C.(1) There is hereby established the Dream Starter Program, to be
administered by the corporation for the purpose of creating a targeted and
accountable program to expand access to first-generation homeownership.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2688 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1133
(2) The program shall be funded through the First-Generation Homebuyer
Assistance Fund as provided in R.S. 39:100.257.
(3) The corporation may coordinate the program with existing state and local
homeownership programs and may partner with private lenders, nonprofit
organizations, and housing counselors.
D. The program shall provide forgivable loans to eligible applicants for the
following:
(1) Down payment assistance.
(2) Closing costs.
(3) Mortgage insurance.
(4) Interest rate buy-downs.
(5) Any other allowable costs established by the corporation by rule.
E. To qualify for assistance under the program, an applicant shall do all of
the following:
(1) Meet the definition of first-time homebuyer or first-generation
homebuyer as provided in this Section.
(2) Complete homebuyer education and financial counseling approved by the
corporation.
(3) Occupy the property as a principal residence for the period of time
established by the corporation by rule.
F. The corporation shall establish income thresholds and prioritization
criteria, with priority considerations for first-generation homebuyers and other
applicants identified in this Section.
G. The corporation shall submit a report to the legislature no later than
February first each year detailing participation, geographic distribution, loan
performance, and program outcomes.
H. The corporation shall implement safeguards including income
verification, occupancy verification, and recapture provisions for noncompliance.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2688 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1133
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.